California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 proclamation of a state of emergency so as to require pruning to the trunk or bud union to establish a new shoot as a replacement for the damaged tree or grapevine, shall be considered a new planting in orchard form.

(5) For purposes of exemption pursuant to this subdivision, any fruit- or nut-bearing tree, or any grapevine, severely damaged during the exemption period by the wildfires that commenced on October 21, 2007, that were the subject of the Governor’s October 21, 2007, proclamation of a state of emergency so as to require pruning to the trunk or bud union to establish a new shoot as a replacement for the damaged tree or grapevine, shall be considered a new planting in orchard form.

(b) The exemption of timber is as specified in subdivision (j) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and Section 436.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 356, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

212.

(a) Notes, debentures, shares of capital stock, solvent credits, bonds, deeds of trust, mortgages, and any interest in that property are exempt from taxation.

(b) Money kept on hand to be used in the ordinary and regular course of a trade, profession, or business is exempt from taxation.

(c) Intangible assets and rights are exempt from taxation and, except as otherwise provided in the following sentence, the value of
 intangible assets and rights shall not enhance or be reflected in the value of taxable property. Taxable property may be assessed and valued by assuming the presence of intangible assets or rights necessary to put the taxable property to beneficial or productive use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 498, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

213.

The exhibition exemption is as specified in this section.

Personal property which comes within all the following descriptions is exempt from taxation:

(a) The property is brought into this State exclusively for purposes of use or exhibition at any exposition, fair, carnival or public exhibit of literary, scientific, educational, religious or artistic works in this State and is used only for these purposes while in this State.

(b) It is intended to remove the property from the State following its use or
 exhibition here.

(c) The property is subject to taxation in some other State or a foreign country while in this State and all taxes due in the other State or country are paid when the exemption is claimed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

213.5.

In partial consideration of the public services provided to property exempted from taxation by Section 214, the owner or person in possession shall permit the free use of such property or portion thereof as a polling place at any election conducted by the registrar of voters if the registrar makes written request for the use of such property at least 60 days before the date of the election. The registrar shall not be entitled to the use of any property used for the practice of religion if the owner or possessor files with him at least 45 days before the election an affidavit that (a) the space requested will be required for the ordinary and usual purposes
 of the owner or possessor on the day of the election, setting forth what such use will be, or (b) by reason of any contract, or condition, or covenant in a deed, made or delivered before July 1, 1965, the use of any portion of such property by the registrar of voters would breach such contract, condition, or covenant. The registrar shall not be entitled to the use of other property if an affidavit under (b) is filed with him.

As used in this section, registrar of voters means county clerk in counties having no registrar of voters.

A county using this section shall insure itself, its employees, the owner, and the person in possession of the property against any liability for any injury connected with the use of the property as a polling place.

Use of property under this section shall be considered to be exclusively for religious, hospital, or charitable
 purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 873.)
-------------------------------------------

213.7.

(a) As used in Section 214, “property used exclusively for religious, hospital, scientific or charitable purposes” shall include the property of a volunteer fire department that is used exclusively for volunteer fire department purposes, provided that the department qualifies for exemption either under Section 23701d or 23701f of this code or under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code. This section shall not be construed to enlarge the “welfare exemption” to apply to organizations qualified under Section 501(c)(3) or
 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, but not otherwise qualified for the “welfare exemption” under other provisions of this code.

(b) As used in this section, “volunteer fire department” means any fund, foundation or corporation regularly organized for volunteer fire department purposes, that qualified as an exempt organization on or before January 1, 1969, either under Section 23701d or 23701f of this code or under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, having official recognition and full or partial support of the government of the county, city, or district in which the volunteer fire department is located, and that has functions having an exclusive connection with the prevention and extinguishing of fires within the area of the county, city, or district extending official recognition for the benefit of the public generally and to lessen the burdens of the entity of government which would otherwise be obligated to
 furnish such fire protection.

(c) For purposes of subdivision (a), an organization shall not be deemed to be qualified as an exempt organization unless the organization files with the assessor a valid organizational clearance certificate issued pursuant to Section 254.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 471, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

214.

(a) Property used exclusively for religious, hospital, scientific, or charitable purposes owned and operated by community chests, funds, foundations, limited liability companies, or corporations organized and operated for religious, hospital, scientific, or charitable purposes is exempt from taxation, including ad valorem taxes to pay the interest and redemption charges on any indebtedness approved by the voters prior to July 1, 1978, or any bonded indebtedness for the acquisition or improvement of real property approved on or after July 1, 1978, by two-thirds of the votes cast by the voters voting on the proposition, if:

(1) The owner is not organized or operated for profit. However, in
 the case of hospitals, the organization shall not be deemed to be organized or operated for profit if, during the immediately preceding fiscal year, operating revenues, exclusive of gifts, endowments, and grants-in-aid, did not exceed operating expenses by an amount equivalent to 10 percent of those operating expenses. As used herein, operating expenses include depreciation based on cost of replacement and amortization of, and interest on, indebtedness.

(2) No part of the net earnings of the owner inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual.

(3) The property is used for the actual operation of the exempt activity, and does not exceed an amount of property reasonably necessary to the accomplishment of the exempt purpose.

(A) For the purposes of determining whether the property is used for the actual operation of the exempt activity, consideration shall not be given to use of the property for either or both of the following described activities if that use is occasional:

(i) The owner conducts fundraising activities on the property and the proceeds derived from those activities are not unrelated business taxable income, as defined in Section 512 of the Internal Revenue Code, of the owner and are used to further the exempt activity of the owner.

(ii) The owner permits any other organization that meets all of the requirements of this subdivision, other than ownership of the property, to conduct fundraising activities on the property and the proceeds derived from those activities are not
 unrelated business taxable income, as defined in Section 512 of the Internal Revenue Code, of the organization, are not subject to the tax on unrelated business taxable income that is imposed by Section 511 of the Internal Revenue Code, and are used to further the exempt activity of the organization.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A):

(i) “Occasional use” means use of the property on an irregular or intermittent basis by the qualifying owner or any other qualifying organization described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) that is incidental to the primary activities of the owner or the other organization.

(ii) “Fundraising activities” means both activities involving the direct solicitation of money or other
 property and the anticipated exchange of goods or services for money between the soliciting organization and the organization or person solicited.

(C) Subparagraph (A) shall have no application in determining whether paragraph (3) has been satisfied unless the owner of the property and any other organization using the property as provided in subparagraph (A) have filed with the assessor a valid organizational clearance certificate issued pursuant to Section 254.6.

(D) For the purposes of determining whether the property is used for the actual operation of the exempt activity, consideration shall not be given to the use of the property for meetings conducted by any other organization if the meetings are incidental to the other organization’s primary activities, are not fundraising
 meetings or activities as defined in subparagraph (B), are held no more than once per week, and the other organization and its use of the property meet all other requirements of paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of this subdivision. The owner or the other organization also shall file with the assessor a copy of a valid, unrevoked letter or ruling from the Internal Revenue Service or the Franchise Tax Board stating that the other organization, or the national organization of which it is a local chapter or affiliate, qualifies as an exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code or Section 23701d, 23701f, or 23701w.

(E) Subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D) shall not be construed to either enlarge or restrict the exemption provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 4 and Section 5 of Article XIII of the California
 Constitution and this section.

(4) The property is not used or operated by the owner or by any other person so as to benefit any officer, trustee, director, shareholder, member, employee, contributor, or bondholder of the owner or operator, or any other person, through the distribution of profits, payment of excessive charges or compensations, or the more advantageous pursuit of their business or profession.

(5) The property is not used by the owner or members thereof for fraternal or lodge purposes, or for social club purposes except where that use is clearly incidental to a primary religious, hospital, scientific, or charitable purpose.

(6) The property is irrevocably dedicated to religious, charitable, scientific, or
 hospital purposes and, upon the liquidation, dissolution, or abandonment of the owner, will not inure to the benefit of any private person except a fund, foundation, or corporation organized and operated for religious, hospital, scientific, or charitable purposes.

(7) The property, if used exclusively for scientific purposes, is used by a foundation or institution that, in addition to complying with the foregoing requirements for the exemption of charitable organizations in general, has been chartered by the Congress of the United States (except that this requirement shall not apply when the scientific purposes are medical research), and whose objects are the encouragement or conduct of scientific investigation, research, and discovery for the benefit of the community at large.

The exemption
 provided for herein shall be known as the “welfare exemption.” This exemption is in addition to any other exemption now provided by law, and the existence of the exemption provision in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 202 does not preclude the exemption under this section for museum or library property. Except as provided in subdivision (e), this section shall not be construed to enlarge the college exemption.

(b) Property used exclusively for school purposes of less than collegiate grade and owned and operated by religious, hospital, or charitable funds, foundations, limited liability companies, or corporations, which property and funds, foundations, limited liability companies, or corporations meet all of the requirements of subdivision (a), shall be deemed to be within the exemption provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 4
 and Section 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and this section.

(c) Property used exclusively for nursery school purposes and owned and operated by religious, hospital, or charitable funds, foundations, limited liability companies, or corporations, which property and funds, foundations, limited liability companies, or corporations meet all the requirements of subdivision (a), shall be deemed to be within the exemption provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 4 and Section 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and this section.

(d) Property used exclusively for a noncommercial educational FM broadcast station or an educational television station, and owned and operated by religious, hospital, scientific, or charitable funds, foundations, limited
 liability companies, or corporations meeting all of the requirements of subdivision (a), shall be deemed to be within the exemption provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 4 and Section 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and this section.

(e) Property used exclusively for religious, charitable, scientific, or hospital purposes and owned and operated by religious, hospital, scientific, or charitable funds, foundations, limited liability companies, or corporations or educational institutions of collegiate grade, as defined in Section 203, which property and funds, foundations, limited liability companies, corporations, or educational institutions meet all of the requirements of subdivision (a), shall be deemed to be within the exemption provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 4 and Section 5 of Article XIII of the California
 Constitution and this section. As to educational institutions of collegiate grade, as defined in Section 203, the requirements of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be met if both of the following are met:

(1) The property of the educational institution is irrevocably dedicated in its articles of incorporation to charitable and educational purposes, to religious and educational purposes, or to educational purposes.

(2) The articles of incorporation of the educational institution provide for distribution of its property upon its liquidation, dissolution, or abandonment to a fund, foundation, or corporation organized and operated for religious, hospital, scientific, charitable, or educational purposes meeting the requirements for exemption provided by Section 203
 or this section.

(f) Property used exclusively for housing and related facilities for elderly or handicapped families and financed by, including, but not limited to, the federal government pursuant to Section 202 of Public Law 86-372 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1701q), as amended, Section 231 of Public Law 73-479 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1715v), Section 236 of Public Law 90-448 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1715z), or Section 811 of Public Law 101-625 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 8013), and owned and operated by religious, hospital, scientific, or charitable funds, foundations, limited liability companies, or corporations meeting all of the requirements of this section shall be deemed to be within the exemption provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 4 and Section 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and this section.

The
 amendment of this paragraph made by Chapter 1102 of the Statutes of 1984 does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law. However, no refund of property taxes shall be required as a result of this amendment for any fiscal year prior to the fiscal year in which the amendment takes effect.

Property used exclusively for housing and related facilities for elderly or handicapped families at which supplemental care or services designed to meet the special needs of elderly or handicapped residents are not provided, or that is not financed by the federal government pursuant to Section 202 of Public Law 86-372 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1701q), as amended, Section 231 of Public Law 73-479 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1715v), Section 236 of Public Law 90-448 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1715z), or Section 811 of Public Law 101-625 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 8013), shall not be entitled to exemption pursuant
 to this subdivision unless the property is used for housing and related facilities for low- and moderate-income elderly or handicapped families. Property that would otherwise be exempt pursuant to this subdivision, except that it includes some housing and related facilities for other than low- or moderate-income elderly or handicapped families, shall be entitled to a partial exemption. The partial exemption shall be equal to that percentage of the value of the property that is equal to the percentage that the number of low- and moderate-income elderly and handicapped families represents of the total number of families occupying the property.

As used in this subdivision, “low and moderate income” has the same meaning as the term “persons and families of low or moderate income” as defined by Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) (1) Property used exclusively for rental housing and related facilities and owned and operated by religious, hospital, scientific, or charitable funds, foundations, limited liability companies, or corporations, including limited partnerships in which the managing general partner is an eligible nonprofit corporation or eligible limited liability company, meeting all of the requirements of this section, or by veterans’ organizations, as described in Section 215.1, meeting all the requirements of paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a), shall be deemed to be within the exemption provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 4 and Section 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and this section and shall be entitled to a partial exemption equal to that percentage of the value of the property that is
 equal to the percentage that the number of units serving lower income households represents of the total number of residential units in any year in which any of the following criteria applies:

(A) The acquisition, rehabilitation, development, or operation of the property, or any combination of these factors, is financed with tax-exempt mortgage revenue bonds, qualified 501(c)(3) bonds, as that term is defined in Section 145 of Title 26 of the United States Code, or general obligation bonds, or is financed by local, state, or federal loans or grants and the rents of the occupants who are lower income households do not exceed those prescribed by deed restrictions or regulatory agreements pursuant to the terms of the financing or financial assistance.

(B) The owner of the property is
 eligible for and receives low-income housing tax credits pursuant to Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as added by Public Law 99-514.

(C) In the case of a claim, other than a claim with respect to property owned by a limited partnership in which the managing general partner is an eligible nonprofit corporation, that is filed for the 2000–01 fiscal year or any fiscal year thereafter, 90 percent or more of the occupants of the property are lower income households whose rent does not exceed the rent prescribed by Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code. The total exemption amount allowed under this subdivision to a taxpayer, with respect to a single property or multiple properties for any fiscal year on the sole basis of the application of this subparagraph, may not exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in assessed
 value.

(D) (i) The property was previously purchased and owned by the Department of Transportation pursuant to a consent decree requiring housing mitigation measures relating to the construction of a freeway and is now solely owned by an organization that qualifies as an exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(ii) This subparagraph does not apply to property owned by a limited partnership in which the managing partner is an eligible nonprofit corporation.

(2) In order to be eligible for the exemption provided by this subdivision, the owner of the property shall do both of the following:

(A) (i) For any claim filed for the 2000–01 fiscal year or any fiscal year thereafter, certify and ensure, subject to the limitation in clause (ii), that there is an enforceable and verifiable agreement with a public agency, a recorded deed restriction, or other legal document that restricts the project’s usage and that provides that the units designated for use by lower income households are continuously available to or occupied by lower income households, subject to the exception in clause (iii), at rents that do not exceed those prescribed by Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code, or, to the extent that the terms of federal, state, or local financing or financial assistance conflicts with Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code, rents that do not exceed those prescribed by the terms of the financing or financial assistance.

(ii) In the case of a limited partnership in which the managing general partner is an eligible nonprofit corporation, the restriction and provision specified in clause (i) shall be contained in an enforceable and verifiable agreement with a public agency, or in a recorded deed restriction to which the limited partnership certifies.

(iii) (I) (ia) In the case of an owner of property that is eligible for and receives a low-income housing tax credit pursuant to Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, a unit shall continue to be treated as occupied by a lower income household if the occupants were lower income households on the lien date in the fiscal year in which their occupancy of the unit commenced and the unit continues to be rent restricted,
 notwithstanding an increase in the income of the occupants of the unit to 140 percent of area median income, adjusted for family size. However, the unit shall cease to be treated as a lower income unit if the income of the occupants of the unit increases above 140 percent of area median income, adjusted for family size.

(ib) This subclause shall only be operative from the 2018–19 fiscal year through the 2027–28 fiscal year.

(II) (ia) In the case of an owner of property, other than a property described in subclause (I), that is subject to an enforceable and verifiable agreement with a public agency, a unit shall continue to be treated as occupied by a lower income household if the occupants were lower income households on the lien date in the fiscal year
 in which their occupancy of the unit commenced and the unit continues to be rent restricted, notwithstanding an increase in the income of the occupants of the unit to 100 percent of area median income, adjusted for family size. However, the unit shall cease to be treated as a lower income unit if the income of the occupants of the unit increases above 100 percent of area median income, adjusted for family size.

(ib) This subclause shall only be operative from the 2024–25 fiscal year through the 2028–29 fiscal year.

(iv) (I) In the case of an owner of property that is a community land trust and whose property is leased to a lower income household, a unit shall continue to be treated as occupied by a lower income household if the occupants were lower income households
 on the lien date in the fiscal year in which their occupancy of the unit commenced and the unit continues to be rent restricted, notwithstanding an increase in the income of the occupants of the unit to 140 percent of area median income, adjusted for family size. However, the unit shall cease to be treated as a lower income unit if the income of the occupants of the unit increases above 140 percent of area median income, adjusted for family size.

(II) This clause shall only be operative from the 2022–23 fiscal year through the 2027–28 fiscal year.

(B) Certify that the funds that would have been necessary to pay property taxes are used to maintain the affordability of, or reduce rents otherwise necessary for, the units occupied by lower income households.

(3) As used in this subdivision:

(A) “Community land trust” has the same meaning as defined in Section 402.1.

(B) “Lower income households” has the same meaning as the term “lower income households” as defined by Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) “Related facilities” means any manager’s units and any and all common area spaces that are included within the physical boundaries of the rental housing development, including, but not limited to, common area space, walkways, balconies, patios, clubhouse space, meeting rooms, laundry facilities, and parking areas, except any portions of the overall development that are nonexempt commercial
 space.

(D) (i) “Units serving lower income households” shall mean units that are occupied by lower income households at an affordable rent, as defined in Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code or, to the extent that the terms of federal, state, or local financing or financial assistance conflicts with Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code, rents that do not exceed those prescribed by the terms of the financing or financial assistance. Units reserved for lower income households at an affordable rent that are temporarily vacant due to tenant turnover or repairs shall be counted as occupied.

(ii) (I) “Units serving lower income households” shall also mean units specified in clause (iii) or (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph
 (2).

(II) This clause shall only be operative from the 2018–19 fiscal year through the 2027–28 fiscal year.

(iii) (I) “Units serving lower income households” shall also mean units specified in clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(II) This clause shall only be operative from the 2022–23 fiscal year through the 2027–28 fiscal year.

(h) Property used exclusively for an emergency or temporary shelter and related facilities for homeless persons and families and owned and operated by religious, hospital, scientific, or charitable funds, foundations, limited liability companies, or corporations meeting all of the requirements of
 this section shall be deemed to be within the exemption provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 4 and Section 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and this section. Property that otherwise would be exempt pursuant to this subdivision, except that it includes housing and related facilities for other than an emergency or temporary shelter, shall be entitled to a partial exemption.

As used in this subdivision, “emergency or temporary shelter” means a facility that would be eligible for funding pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 50800) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) Property used exclusively for housing and related facilities for employees of religious, charitable, scientific, or hospital organizations that meet all the requirements of
 subdivision (a) and owned and operated by funds, foundations, limited liability companies, or corporations that meet all the requirements of subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be within the exemption provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 4 and Section 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and this section to the extent the residential use of the property is institutionally necessary for the operation of the organization.

(j) For purposes of this section, charitable purposes include educational purposes. For purposes of this subdivision, “educational purposes” means those educational purposes and activities for the benefit of the community as a whole or an unascertainable and indefinite portion thereof, and do not include those educational purposes and activities that are primarily for the benefit of an organization’s
 shareholders. Educational activities include the study of relevant information, the dissemination of that information to interested members of the general public, and the participation of interested members of the general public.

(k) In the case of property used exclusively for the exempt purposes specified in this section, owned and operated by limited liability companies that are organized and operated for those purposes, the State Board of Equalization shall adopt regulations to specify the ownership, organizational, and operational requirements for those companies to qualify for the exemption provided by this section.

(l) The amendments made by Chapter 354 of the Statutes of 2004 apply with respect to lien dates occurring on and after January 1, 2005.

(m) The amendments made by Chapter 836 of the Statutes of 2016 apply with respect to lien dates occurring on and after January 1, 2017.

(n) The amendments made by Chapter 694 of the Statutes of 2018 apply with respect to lien dates occurring on and after January 1, 2019.

(o) Notwithstanding Section 20 or any other law, the State Board of Equalization is responsible for administering the welfare exemption provided by this section, except where the law places responsibility for administering that exemption with the county assessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 580, Sec. 6.   (AB 2897)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

214.01.

(a) For the purpose of Section 214, property shall be deemed irrevocably dedicated to religious, charitable, scientific, or hospital purposes only if a statement of irrevocable dedication to only these purposes is found in the articles of incorporation of the corporation, or in the case of any other fund or foundation, limited liability company, or corporation chartered by an act of Congress, in the bylaws, articles of association, articles of organization, constitution, or regulations thereof, as determined by the State Board of
 Equalization.

(b) If, when performing the duties specified by Section 254.6, the board finds that an applicant for the welfare exemption is ineligible for an organizational clearance certificate, because at the time of the filing of the claim required by Section 254.6, the applicant’s articles of incorporation, or in the case of any noncorporate fund or foundation, its bylaws, articles of association, articles of organization, constitution or regulations, did not comply with the provisions of this section, the board shall notify the applicant in writing. The applicant shall have until the next succeeding lien date to amend its articles of incorporation, or in the case of any noncorporate fund or foundation, its bylaws, articles of association, articles of organization, constitution or regulations, and to file a certified copy of these amendments that conform to the provisions of this section with the board, and the board shall make a finding
 that the applicant, if otherwise qualified, is eligible for an organizational clearance certificate and forward that finding to the assessor.

(c) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply with respect to lien dates occurring on and after January 1, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 354, Sec. 3.   Effective August 30, 2004.   Applicable January 1, 2005, as specified in subd. (c).)
-------------------------------------------

214.02.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c), property that is used exclusively for the preservation of native plants or animals, biotic communities, geological or geographical formations of scientific or educational interest, or open-space lands used solely for recreation and for the enjoyment of scenic beauty, is open to the general public subject to reasonable restrictions concerning the needs of the land, and is owned and operated by a scientific or charitable fund, foundation, limited liability company, or corporation, the primary interest of which is to preserve those natural areas, and that meets all the requirements of Section 214, shall be deemed to be within the exemption provided for in subdivision (b) of Sections 4 and 5 of Article XIII of the Constitution of the State of California and Section 214.

(b) The exemption provided by this section shall not apply to any property of an organization that owns in the aggregate 30,000 acres or more in one county that were exempt under this section prior to March 1, 1983, or that are proposed to be exempt, unless the nonprofit organization that holds the property is fully independent of the owner of any taxable real property that is adjacent to the property otherwise qualifying for tax exemption under this section. For purposes of this section, the nonprofit organization that holds the property shall be considered fully independent if the exempt property is not used or operated by that organization or by any other person so as to benefit any officer, trustee, director, shareholder, member, employee, contributor or bondholder of the exempt organization or operator, or the owner of any adjacent property, or any other person, through the distribution of profits, payment of excessive charges or
 compensations, or the more advantageous pursuit of their business or profession.

(c) The exemption provided by this section shall not apply to property that is reserved for future development.

(d) (1) For the purposes of determining whether the property is used for the actual operation of the exempt activity as required by subdivision (a), consideration shall not be given to the use of the property for either of the following:

(A) Activities resulting in direct or in-kind revenues provided that the activities further the conservation objectives of the property as provided in a qualified conservation management plan for the property. These revenues include those revenues derived from grazing leases, hunting and camping permits, rents from persons performing caretaking activities who reside in
 dwellings on the property, and admission fees collected for purposes of public enjoyment.

(B) Any lease of the property for a purpose that furthers the conservation objectives of the property as provided in a qualified conservation management plan for the property.

(2) The activities and lease described in paragraph (1) may not generate unrelated business income.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a “qualified conservation management plan” means a plan that satisfies all of the following:

(A) Identifies both of the following:

(i) That the foremost purpose and use of the property is for the preservation of native plants or animals, biotic communities, geological or geographical
 formations of scientific or educational interest, or as open-space lands used solely for recreation and for the enjoyment of scenic beauty.

(ii) The overall conservation management goals, including, but not limited to, identification of permitted activities, and actions necessary to achieve the goals.

(B) Describes both of the following:

(i) The natural resources and recreational attributes of the property.

(ii) Potential threats to the conservation values or areas of special concern.

(C) Contains a timeline for planned management activities and for regular inspections of the property, including existing structures and improvements.

(e) This section shall be operative from the lien date in 1983 to and including the lien date in 2027, after which date this section shall become inoperative, and as of January 1, 2028, this section is repealed.

(f) The amendments made by Section 4 of Chapter 354 of the Statutes of 2004 shall apply with respect to lien dates occurring on and after January 1, 2005.

(g) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply commencing with the lien date for the 2013–14 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 433, Sec. 4.   (SB 825)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Inoperative after the January 1, 2027, lien date.    Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

214.03.

(a) Property that is used exclusively for the preservation of native plants or animals, biotic communities, geological or geographical formations of scientific or educational interest, tribal traditional knowledge, as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 8012 of the Health and Safety Code, or open-space lands used solely for recreation and for the enjoyment of scenic beauty, is open to the general public subject to reasonable restrictions concerning the needs of the land, and is owned and operated by a federally recognized Indian
 tribe or a wholly owned subsidiary of a federally recognized Indian tribe shall be deemed to be within the exemption provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 4 and in Section 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and in Section 214.

(b) The exemption provided by this section shall not apply to property that is reserved for future development.

(c) (1) For the purposes of determining whether the property is used for the actual operation of the exempt activity as required by subdivision (a), consideration shall not be given to the use of the property for either of the following:

(A) Activities resulting in direct or in-kind revenues, provided that the activities further the conservation objectives of the property as provided in a qualified conservation management plan for the property. These revenues include those revenues derived from grazing leases, hunting and camping permits, rents from persons performing caretaking activities who reside in dwellings on the property, and parking and admission fees collected for purposes of public enjoyment.

(B) Any lease of the property for a purpose that furthers the conservation objectives of the property, as provided in a qualified conservation management plan for the property.

(2) The
 activities and lease described in paragraph (1) may not generate unrelated business income.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a “qualified conservation management plan” means a plan that satisfies all of the following:

(A) Identifies both of the following:

(i) That the foremost purpose and use of the property is for the preservation of native plants or animals, biotic communities, geological or geographical formations of scientific or educational interest, tribal traditional knowledge, or as open-space lands used solely for recreation and for the
 enjoyment of scenic beauty.

(ii) The overall conservation management goals, including, but not limited to, identification of permitted activities, and actions necessary to achieve those goals.

(B) Describes both of the following:

(i) The natural resources, tribal traditional knowledge, and recreational attributes of the property.

(ii) Potential threats to the conservation values or areas of special concern.

(C) Contains a timeline for planned management activities and for regular inspections of the property, including existing structures and improvements. 
